Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
DIVISIONS, DEPARTMENTS, AND PROGRAMS

A. Community Colleges

[1. general provisions]

Revision Note

Subdivision heading added by revisor.

[§304A-1101] System of community colleges;
purpose. (a) The board of regents shall develop and administer a system
of community colleges.

(b) The purposes of community colleges shall
be to provide:

(1) Two-year college transfer and general education
programs;

(2) Two- and four-year career and technical education
programs;

(3) Semiprofessional, career and technical, and
continuing education programs; and

(4) Such other educational programs and services as
may be appropriate to such institutions.

(c) The board may confer a corresponding
degree or certificate upon the successful completion of any educational program
described in subsection (b) to all students who are entitled thereto. [L 2006,
c 75, pt of §2]

Cross References

Apprentice instructor, responsibility, see §372-6.

Workforce development scholarship program, see §304A-505.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next